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DTC 41 Fuel Tank Select Relay Circuit Malfunction
(Fuel Tank Changeover Switch ON)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 08.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

41

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch ON

(Voltage of FPMS terminal is high)
(b) Voltage of FPM1 terminal is high
(c) Voltage of FPM2 terminal is low

S Open or short in fuel tank select relay circuit
S Fuel tank select relay
S Open or short in sub fuel pump circuit
S Sub fuel pump
S Short in main fuel pump circuit (+B short)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 08.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI−49).

NG Replace fuel tank select relay.

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal FPM2 of engine ECU connector and body
ground (See page DI−1 22, step 1).

OK Go to step 4.

NG

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank change-
over switch and fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and body ground
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness and connector, and
then go to step 8.

OK
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4 Check operation of sub fuel pump (See page DI−1 22, step 5).

HINT:
If you have no hand−held tester, and then go to step 5.

OK Go to step 7.

NG

5 Check sub fuel pump (See page FI−1 6) .

NG Replace sub fuel pump, and then go to step 8.

OK

6 Check for open or short in harness and connector between sub fuel pump and
fuel tank select relay (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace, and then go to step 8.

OK

7 Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank select
relay and engine ECU, sub fuel tank forcing driving relay and engine ECU (See
page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace, and then go to step 8.

OK
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8 Check for short in harness and connector between main fuel pump and fuel tank
select relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


